Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 6
Child Labor

Cross References.

Exemption, children employed in entertainment industry, § 11-12-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 15: effective on passage. Declared effective by Governor, Oct. 13, 1914.

Acts 1967, No. 641, § 4: approved Apr. 6, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and declared by the General Assembly that the providing for children of an opportunity to develop a business interest and to promote in them a spirit of industry is essential to the public health, safety and welfare; that the provisions of this Act are immediately needed for the accomplishment of this purpose and that only by giving immediate effect to this Act can these purposes be realized to the fullest possible extent. It is, therefore, declared that an emergency exists, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 449, § 3: Mar. 23, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an increase in juvenile delinquency in the State of Arkansas, that the lack of suitable employment opportunities for minors contributes to the cause of delinquency, and that this Act is immediately necessary in order to assist in alleviating juvenile delinquency and providing additional employment opportunities to the youth of the State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 11, § 3: Jan. 30, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there are certain restrictions placed by law upon the employment of persons between the ages of sixteen and eighteen years; that many persons between the ages of sixteen and eighteen years have graduated from high school, vocational, or technical schools, and are employable for more hours than the law presently permits; that there are ample safeguards for employees between the ages of sixteen and eighteen years in the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq., against oppressive child labor; that this Act is immediately necessary to provide additional employment opportunities to the youth of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1170, § 5: Apr. 10, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Child Labor Laws of this state prohibit children from working as “batboys” or “batgirls” at baseball games; that children need this opportunity to develop business interest related to professional baseball and to promote in them a spirit of thrift and industry by encouraging their involvement in situations where the parent, child and community will be benefitted; and that this act provides the opportunity for children to serve as “batboys” or “batgirls”. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1120, § 5: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that persons engaged in the agricultural industry are suffering from a hardship because there are not enough employees available to adequately harvest crops; that it would advantageous to the State of Arkansas to allow persons engaged in the agriculture industry to hire persons between the ages of twelve (12) and sixteen (16) years outside of school hours; that presently there are restrictions placed by law upon the employment of persons between the ages of twelve (12) and sixteen (16) years; that there are ample safeguards for employees between the ages of twelve (12) and sixteen (16) in the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. 201, et seq., against oppressive child labor; that the provisions of this act are consistent with the provisions of the Fair Labor Standards Act; that this act is immediately necessary to protect the livelihood of Arkansas farmers and to provide the youth of this State with an opportunity for summer employment. Therefore, and emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 577, § 8: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that this act must go into effect on the date the biennial appropriation for the Department of Labor goes into effect, which is July 1, 2001, and that the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provisions of essential government programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2015, No. 162, § 2: Feb. 23, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are restrictions on the
number of hours of employment or days of employment for a person who is seventeen-years old or seventeen (17) years of age; that many employers have avoided the excessive time and costs necessary to comply with the restrictions by employing individuals who are adults; that by removing the
restrictions on employment of persons who are seventeen-years old or seventeen (17) years of age, an employer will have greater flexibility to hire employees; and that this act is immediately necessary because persons who are seventeen-years old or seventeen (17) years of age may be considered for employment opportunities that have previously been unavailable. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-6-101. Industrial education not prohibited.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent children of any age from receiving industrial education furnished by the United States, this state, or any city or town in the state and duly approved by the State Board of Education or by any other duly constituted public authority.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 12, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., § 7098; Pope's Dig., § 9080; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-713.

11-6-102. Certain children excepted from chapter.

No boy or girl between the ages of sixteen (16) years and eighteen (18) years shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter if:

The boy or girl is a graduate of any high school, vocational school, or technical school;

The boy or girl is married or is a parent.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 6, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., § 7091; Pope's Dig., § 9073; Acts 1975, No. 11, § 1; 1977, No. 326, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-707.

11-6-103. Penalty — Disposition of fines.

Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, parent, guardian, or custodian who employs or permits or suffers any child to be employed or to work in violation of this subchapter or §§ 11-12-101 — 11-12-105, or any rules issued thereunder, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

Each day the violation continues shall with respect to each child so employed or permitted work constitute a separate offense.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall determine the amount of such penalty and shall consider the appropriateness of such penalty to the size of the business and the gravity of the violation.

The determination by the director shall be final unless within fifteen (15) days after receipt of notice thereof by certified mail, the person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association charged with the violation notifies the director in writing that he or she contests the proposed penalty. In the event that penalty is contested, a final determination shall be made pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The amount of penalty when finally determined may be recovered in a civil action brought by the director in a court of competent jurisdiction, without paying costs or giving bond for costs.

Sums collected under this section shall be paid into the Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund.

Assessment of a civil penalty by the director shall be made no later than two (2) years from the date of the occurrence of the violation.

In addition to the civil penalty provided by this section, the director is authorized to petition any court of competent jurisdiction, without paying costs or giving bond for costs, to enjoin or restrain any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association who violates the provisions of this subchapter or §§ 11-12-101 — 11-12-105, or any rule issued thereunder.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 13, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., § 7099; Pope's Dig., § 9081; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-714; Acts 1991, No. 509, § 1; 2001, No. 577, § 7; 2019, No. 315, §§ 770, 771; 2019, No. 910, §§
5337, 5338.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (g).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b); and substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund” for “Department of Labor Special Fund” in (e).

11-6-104. Children under age 14 years prohibited from working — Exception.

No child under the age of fourteen (14) years shall be employed or permitted to work in any remunerative occupation in this state, except that during school vacation, children under fourteen (14) years may be employed by their parents or guardians in occupations owned or controlled by them.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 1, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C & M. Dig., § 7085; Pope's Dig., § 9067; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-701.

Publisher's Notes.

This section was held to supersede § 18-42-102 as to employment contracts with minors under fourteen years of age in Clark v. Arkansas Democrat Co., 242 Ark. 133, 413 S.W.2d 629 (1967).

Cross References.

Contracts of minors over 15 years of age, § 18-42-102.

11-6-105. Children under age 16 years — Restrictions on employment generally.

No child under sixteen (16) years shall be employed or permitted to work in any occupation dangerous to the life and limb, or injurious to the health and morals of the child, or in any saloon, resort, or bar where intoxicating liquors of any kind are sold or dispensed.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., § 7086; Pope's Dig., § 9068; Acts 1977, No. 321, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-702.

Cross References.

Alcoholic beverages, § 3-1-101 et seq.

11-6-106. Children under age 16 years — Prohibitions against certain kinds and places of work — Exceptions.

No child under the age of sixteen (16) years shall be employed upon the stage of any theater or concert hall or in connection with any theatrical performance or other exhibition or show, and no child shall be employed who has not passed four (4) yearly grades in the public school or equivalent thereof.

However, a child under sixteen (16) years may be employed in a theatrical production or in a saloon, resort, or bar when the child and his or her parent or guardian perform together as part of the same show and the parent or guardian remains with the child in order to supervise him or her.

No child under the age of sixteen (16) years shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work in any capacity:

In, about, or in connection with any processes in which dangerous or poisonous acids or gases or other chemicals are used;

In soldering;

In occupations causing dust in injurious quantities;

In scaffolding;

In heavy work in the building trades;

In any tunnel or excavation;

In any mine, coal breaker, coke oven, or quarry; or

In any pool or billiard room.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, §§ 2, 4, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7086, 7089; Pope's Dig., §§ 9068, 9071; Acts 1977, No. 321, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-702, 81-705; 1995, No. 858, § 1.

Cross References.

Working in mines, ages, § 11-7-318.

11-6-107. Children under age 16 years — Prohibitions against certain kinds and places of work.

No child under sixteen (16) years shall be employed or permitted to work at any of the following occupations:

Adjusting any belt to any machinery;

Sewing or lacing machine belts in any workshop or factory;

Oiling, wiping, or cleaning machinery or assisting therein;

Operating or assisting in operating any of the following machines:

Circular or band saws;

Wood shapers;

Wood jointers;

Planers;

Sandpaper or wood polishing machinery;

Wood turning or boring machinery;

Picker machines or machines used in picking wool;

Carding machines;

Job or cylinder printing presses operated by power other than foot power;

Boring or drill presses;

Stamping machines used in metal or in paper or leather manufacturing;

Metal or paper cutting machines;

Corner staying machines in paper box factories;

Steam boilers;

Dough brakes or cracker machinery of any description;

Wire or iron straightening or drawing machinery;

Rolling mill machinery;

Washing, grinding, or mixing machinery; or

Laundering machinery;

In proximity to any hazardous or unguarded belt, machinery, or gearing; or

Upon any railroad, whether steam, electric, or hydraulic.

The Director of the Division of Labor may, from time to time after a hearing duly had, determine what other occupations are sufficiently dangerous to the life or limb or injurious to the health or morals of children under sixteen (16) years to justify their exclusion therefrom. No child under sixteen (16) years of age shall be employed or permitted to work in any occupation thus determined to be dangerous or injurious.

There shall be right of appeal from any such determination pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 3 (1st and 2nd par.), Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7087, 7088; Pope's Dig., §§ 9069, 9070; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-703, 81-704; Acts 1991, No. 565, § 1; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5339.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the first sentence of (b)(1).

11-6-108. Children under age 16 years — Hours of employment.

No child under the age of sixteen (16) years shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work for more than six (6) days in any week, nor more than forty-eight (48) hours in any week, nor more than eight (8) hours in any day or before 6:00 a.m. or after 7:00 p.m., except that on nights preceding nonschool days, children under the age of sixteen (16) years may be employed until 9:00 p.m.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 5, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., § 7090; Pope's Dig., § 9072; Acts 1973, No. 449, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-706.

11-6-109. Children under age 16 years — Employment certificate required.

No person, firm, or corporation shall employ or permit any child under sixteen (16) years to work in or in connection with any establishment or occupation unless the person, firm, or corporation employing the child procures and keeps on file, accessible to the Division of Labor and the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, or local school officials, an employment certificate as provided in this section.

The employment certificate shall be issued only by the Director of the Division of Labor.

Application for an employment certificate shall be made on a form approved by the director and shall require submission of the following:

Proof of age;

A description of the work and work schedule; and

Written consent of the parent or guardian.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, §§ 7-10, Acts 1915, p. 1505; Acts 1917, No. 391, § 1, p. 1849; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7092-7095; Pope's Dig., §§ 9074-9077; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-708—81-711; Acts 1991, No. 565, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5340, 5341.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” and “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (a); and substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b)(1).

11-6-110. Children under age 17 years — Hours of employment.

A child under seventeen (17) years of age shall not be employed or permitted to work in any occupation:

More than six (6) days in any week;

More than fifty-four (54) hours in any week;

More than ten (10) consecutive hours in any one (1) day;

More than ten (10) hours in a twenty-four-hour period; or

Before 6:00 a.m. or after 11:00 p.m., except that the limitations of 6:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m. shall not apply to children under seventeen (17) years of age employed on nights preceding nonschool days in occupations determined by rule of the Division of Labor to be sufficiently safe for their employment.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 6, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., § 7091; Pope's Dig., § 9073; Acts 1973, No. 449, § 2; 1975, No. 11, § 1; 1977, No. 326, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-707; 2005, No. 939, § 1; 2015, No. 162, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “17” for “18” in the section heading; in the introductory language, substituted “A child” for “No boy or girl,” “seventeen (17) years of age” for “the age of eighteen (18) years,” and “shall not be employed or permitted” for “shall be employed, permitted, or suffered”; and substituted “seventeen (17) years of age” for “the age of eighteen (18) years” in (5).

11-6-111. Inspection of workplace — Prosecution of violators.

The Director of the Division of Labor or his or her designee shall have the right to enter any building or premises for the purpose of inspection to ascertain whether any child is employed or permitted to work in violation of the provisions of this subchapter.

It shall be the duty of the director to enforce and administer the provisions of this subchapter.

The director is authorized to adopt rules for the enforcement and administration of this subchapter.

The director may revoke an employment certificate for cause.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 1, § 11, Acts 1915, p. 1505; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7096, 7097; Pope's Dig., §§ 9078, 9079; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-712; Acts 1991, No. 565, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 772; 2019, No. 910, § 5342.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-6-112. Newspaper delivery work permitted.

The purpose of this section is to provide children with an opportunity to develop business interests and to promote in them a spirit of thrift and industry by encouragement of their engagement in a particular situation when the child, parent, and community will be benefited and which tends to prevent juvenile delinquency.

A minor may be employed or may enter into contracts, upon written approval of the parent or guardian of the minor, to buy, sell, and deliver and to collect for newspapers during the school term or during vacation, if the child is attending school, as required by law, and does not engage in the employment or activity except at times when his or her presence is not required at school.

The provisions of §§ 11-6-101 — 11-6-111, with respect to child labor, shall not be applicable with respect to the contract or employment as authorized in this section.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable only where the provision is made by the employer or newspaper company contractor to provide insurance or indemnity for injury to or death of the minor arising out of bodily injury caused by an accident when the accident hazard arises while the minor is on the business of the employer or performing the activities set out in the contract.

The schedule of benefits under this program of insurance or indemnity shall provide at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for accidental death of the minor, and the sum shall be reasonably and equitably prorated for dismemberment of the minor.

The insurance or indemnity shall further provide blanket medical coverage for all hospital and medical expenses up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) resulting from an accident.

This hospital and medical expense protection shall be excess insurance coverage or indemnity over and above any other collectible insurance.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 641, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-715, 81-716.

11-6-113. Professional baseball work as batboy or batgirl permitted.

The purpose of this section is to provide children with an opportunity to develop business interests related to professional baseball and to promote in them a spirit of thrift and industry by encouragement of their engagement in a particular situation when the child, parent, and community will be benefited and which tends to prevent juvenile delinquency.

A minor may be employed or may enter into contracts, upon written approval of the parent or guardian of the minor, to serve as and perform the duties of a batboy or batgirl for a professional baseball club, during the school term, or during vacation, if the child is attending school as required by law and does not engage in the employment or activity except at times when his or her presence is not required at school.

The provisions of §§ 11-6-101 — 11-6-112, with respect to child labor, shall not be applicable with respect to the contract or employment as authorized in this section.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable only where the provision is made by the employer or professional baseball club to provide insurance or indemnity for injury to or death of the minor arising out of bodily injury caused by an accident when the accident hazard arises while the minor is on the business of the employer or performing the activities set out in the contract.

No child shall be employed or permitted to work pursuant to the provisions of this section for more than ten (10) hours in any day or after 11:00 p.m. on nights preceding school days or after 1:00 a.m. on nights preceding nonschool days.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1170, § 1.

11-6-114. Seasonal agricultural labor permitted.

As used in this section, “employed in agriculture” means employed as a seasonal agricultural laborer to pick, plant, harvest, grade, sort, or haul any crop, fruit, or vegetable by use of the employee's hands.

Except as provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter relating to child labor, shall not apply to any employee employed in agriculture outside of school hours of the school district where such employee is living while he or she is so employed, if such employee is fourteen (14) years of age or older.

The provisions of §§ 11-6-108 and 11-6-110, relating to hours of employment, shall apply to any person employed under this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1120, § 1.

11-6-115. Domestic labor and child care in connection with church functions permitted — Definition.

As used in this section, “domestic labor” means any occasional, irregular, or incidental work related to and in or around private residences, including, but not limited to babysitting, pet sitting, similar household chores, and manual yard work. This definition specifically excludes industrial homework, work for a third party such as a sitting service, and any activity determined by the Director of the Division of Labor to be hazardous pursuant to the provisions of § 11-6-107(b).

Except as provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter relating to child labor, shall not apply to any child employed for the purposes of domestic labor.

Except as provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter relating to child labor, shall not apply to employees of churches performing childcare services where children are cared for during short periods of time while parents or persons in charge of the children are attending church services or functions.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 934, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5343.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the second sentence of (a).

11-6-116. Sports officiating permitted in certain sports.

As used in this section, “employed as a sports official” means employed as an official, referee, or umpire in organized youth football, baseball, softball, basketball, or soccer leagues.

Except as provided in this section, the provisions of this chapter relating to child labor shall not apply to a minor at least eleven (11) years of age employed as a sports official for an age bracket younger than the minor's own age if:

An adult representing the state or local athletic program is on the premises at which the athletic program event is occurring; and

A person responsible for the state or local athletic program possesses a written acknowledgment signed by the minor's parent or guardian consenting to the minor's employment as a sports official.

The provisions of §§ 11-6-108 and 11-6-110, relating to hours of employment, shall apply to any minor employed under this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 940, § 1.